North Carolina statutes. Chapter 18B. Regulation of Alcoholic Beverages.
Article 10. Retail Activity.
§ 18B-1001.1.
Authorization of wine shipper permit.

A winery holding a federal basic wine manufacturing permit located within or outside of the State may apply to the Commission for issuance of a wine shipper permit that shall authorize the shipment of brands of fortified and unfortified wines identified in the application. The applicant shall not be required to pay an application fee for the wine shipper permit. A wine shipper permittee may amend the brands of wines identified in the permit application but shall file any amendment with the Commission. Any winery that applies for a wine shipper permit shall notify in writing any wholesalers that have been authorized to distribute the winery’s brands within the State that an application has been filed for a wine shipper permit. A wine shipper permittee may sell and ship not more than two cases of wine per month to any person in North Carolina to whom alcoholic beverages may be lawfully sold. All sales and shipments shall be for personal use only and not for resale. A case of wine shall mean any combination of packages containing not more than nine liters of wine.

A wine shipper permittee that ships to addresses in the State more than 1,000 cases of wine in a calendar year must appoint at least one wholesaler to offer and sell the products of the wine shipper permittee under Article 12 of this Chapter if the wine shipper permittee is contacted by a wholesaler that wishes to sell the products of the wine shipper permittee. This provision shall not be construed to require the wine shipper permittee to appoint the wholesaler that originally contacted the wine shipper permittee. Wine purchased by a resident of the State at the premises of the wine shipper permittee and shipped to an address in the State under G.S. 18B-109(d) shall not be included in calculating the total of 1,000 cases per year.

A wine shipper permittee may contract with the holder of a wine shipper packager permit for the packaging and shipment of wine pursuant to this section. The direct shipment of wine by wine shipper or wine shipper packager permittees pursuant to this section shall be made by approved common carrier only. Each common carrier shall apply to the Commission for approval to provide common carriage of wines shipped by holders of permits issued pursuant to this section.Each common carrier making deliveries pursuant to this section shall:

Require the recipient, upon delivery, to demonstrate that the recipient is at least 21 years of age by providing a form of identification specified in G.S. 18B-302(d)(1).

Require the recipient to sign an electronic or paper form or other acknowledgment of receipt as approved by the Commission.

Refuse delivery when the proposed recipient appears to be under the age of 21 years and refuses to present valid identification as required by subdivision (1) of this subsection.

Submit any other information that the Commission shall require.All wine shipper and wine shipper packager permittees shipping wines pursuant to this section shall affix a notice in 26-point type or larger to the outside of each package of wine shipped within or to the State in a conspicuous location stating: “CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES; SIGNATURE OF PERSON AGED 21 YEARS OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY”. Any delivery of wines to a person under 21 years of age by a common carrier shall constitute a violation of G.S. 18B-302(a)(1) by the common carrier. The common carrier and the wine shipper or wine shipper packager permittee shall be liable only for their independent acts.

A wine shipper permittee shall be subject to jurisdiction of the North Carolina courts by virtue of applying for a wine shipper permit and shall comply with any audit or other compliance requirements of the Commission and the Department of Revenue.

History.

2003-402, s. 2; 2004-203, s. 26(a); 2005-380, s. 2; 2006-227, s. 4.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2004-203, s. 26(a), effective on or after October 1, 2003, substituted “18B-109(d)” for “18B-109(b)” in subsection (b).

Session Laws 2005-380, s. 2, effective September 8, 2005, added the second sentence of subsection (a).

Session Laws 2006-227, s. 4, effective August 10, 2006, in subsection (c), rewrote the first paragraph, inserted “wine shipper packager” twice in the third paragraph, and made related changes.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment, “In Vino Veritas: Does the Twenty-First Amendment Really Protect a State’s Right to Regulate Alcohol? An Overview of the North Carolina Wine Industry and the Continuing Wine Distribution Litigation,” see 31 Campbell L. Rev. 123 (2008).

§ 18B-1001.2.
Additional wine shipping requirements.

A wine shipper permittee shall:

Compile and submit to the Commission quarterly a summary indicating all wine products shipped, including brand and price of each product, date of each shipment, quantity of each shipment, and amount of excise and sales tax remitted to the Department of Revenue. The report shall include all wine products shipped on the permittee’s behalf under contract with a wine shipper packager.

Register with the Department of Revenue as a wine shipper permittee and provide any additional information required by the Department.

The Commission may adopt rules to carry out the provisions of this section and other related provisions governing the direct shipping of wine.

History.

2003-402, s. 3; 2006-227, s. 5.

Effect of Amendments.

Session Laws 2006-227, s. 5, effective August 10, 2006, added the last sentence in subdivision (a)(1).

§ 18B-1001.3.
Authorization of wine shipper packager permit.

The holder of a wine shipper packager permit may provide services for the warehousing, packaging, and shipment of wine on behalf of a winery holding a wine shipper permit. A wine shipper packager permit authorizes the holder to receive, in closed containers, wine produced by and belonging to a wine shipper permittee and to place the unopened wine in containers or packaging materials as a service to the wine shipper permittee in connection with the marketing and sale of its wine products. A wine shipper packager may package and return wine products to the wine shipper permittee or, on behalf of the wine shipper permittee, may package and ship wine products in closed containers to individual purchasers inside and outside this State in accordance with the provisions of

G.S. 18B-1001.1

. The permit may be issued to a USDA-approved company specializing in warehousing and contract packaging.

History.

2006-227, s. 6.

§ 18B-1001.4.
Authorization of delivery service permit.

Authorization. — The holder of a delivery service permit, or the permit holder’s employee or independent contractor, may deliver malt beverages, unfortified wine, or fortified wine on behalf of a retailer holding a permit issued pursuant to subdivisions (1) through (6) and (16) of

G.S. 18B-1001

to a location designated by the purchaser. A delivery service permittee may also facilitate delivery through technology services that connect consumers and licensed retailers through the use of the Internet, mobile applications, and other similar technology.

Training and Payment. — Prior to making any deliveries, each individual delivering alcoholic beverages pursuant to a delivery service permit shall successfully complete a course approved by the Commission related to the delivery of alcoholic beverages. Upon receipt of a proposed training program from a holder of a delivery service permit, the Commission shall have 15 business days to approve, deny, or request modifications to the proposed training program. An individual delivering alcoholic beverages pursuant to a delivery service permit shall not handle or possess funds used to purchase an alcoholic beverage that is to be delivered, but may facilitate the sales transaction in a manner that does not involve taking possession of funds.

Age of Recipient and Notice. — An individual may only deliver alcoholic beverages pursuant to a delivery service permit to an individual who is at least 21 years of age and who immediately takes actual possession of the alcoholic beverages purchased. A delivery of alcoholic beverages in a package that obscures the manufacturer’s original packaging shall have affixed to the outside of the package a notice in 26-point type or larger stating: “CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES; AGE VERIFICATION REQUIRED.”

Limitations. — A delivery service permittee shall deliver alcoholic beverages only within the time allowed for lawful sales and consumption in the jurisdiction where the delivery is located. No delivery shall be made to any jurisdiction within the State that has not authorized the sale of the purchased alcoholic beverages. A delivery service permittee shall not deliver alcoholic beverages to the premises of another licensed retailer or more than 50 miles from the retailer’s licensed premises. Only alcoholic beverages purchased for personal consumption and from a licensed retailer’s existing inventory located on the retailer’s premises may be delivered pursuant to a delivery service permit.

Scope and Construction. — A delivery service permit is not required for a common carrier lawfully transporting or shipping alcoholic beverages. Nothing in this section shall be construed as exempting the delivery of alcoholic beverages pursuant to a delivery service permit from the requirements set forth in Article 4 of Chapter 18B of the General Statutes. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a technology services company to obtain a delivery service permit if the company does not employ or contract with delivery drivers, but rather provides software or an application that connects consumers and licensed retailers for the delivery of alcoholic beverages from the licensed retailer. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a retailer that holds a permit issued pursuant to subdivisions (1) through (6) and (16) of

G.S. 18B-1001

to obtain a delivery service permit in order for employees of the retail permittee to deliver malt beverages, unfortified wine, or fortified wine to a location designated by the purchaser, however, the other provisions of this section apply to the retailer.

Penalties for Violations in Residence Halls. — Notwithstanding

G.S. 18B-104

, if a delivery service permittee commits a violation of this Chapter when delivering to a residence hall located on the premises of an institution of higher education the delivery service permittee shall be subject to a fine of up to one thousand dollars ($1,000) for the first violation, up to one thousand five hundred dollars ($1,500) for a second violation within three years of the first violation, and up to two thousand dollars ($2,000) for a third or subsequent violation within three years of the first violation. In any case in which there are two or more violations within three years by a delivery service permittee when delivering to a residence hall on the premises of an institution of higher education in which the Commission is entitled to suspend or revoke a permit, the Commission may accept from the permittee an offer in compromise to pay a penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000). The Commission may either accept a compromise or revoke a permit, but not both. The Commission may accept a compromise and suspend the permit in the same case.

History.

2019-182, s. 20(a); 2021-150, s. 26.1.

§ 18B-1002.
Special one-time permits.

Kinds of Permits. — In addition to the other permits authorized by this Chapter, the Commission may issue permits for the following activities:

A permit may be issued to a person who acquires ownership or possession of alcoholic beverages through bankruptcy, inheritance, foreclosure, judicial sale, or other special occurrence, and who does not already have a permit authorizing the sale of that kind of alcoholic beverage. The permit may authorize the sale or other disposition of the alcoholic beverages in a manner prescribed by the Commission.

A permit may be issued to a nonprofit organization to allow the retail sale of malt beverages, unfortified wine, fortified wine, or mixed beverages, or to allow brown-bagging, at a single fund-raising event of that organization. A permit for this purpose shall not be issued for the sale of any kind of alcoholic beverage in a jurisdiction where the sale of that alcoholic beverage is not lawful.

A permit may be issued to a permittee who is going out of business to authorize the sale or other disposition of his alcoholic beverages stock in a manner that would not otherwise be authorized under his permit.

A permit may be issued to a collector of wine, decorative decanters of spirituous liquor, or antique spirituous liquor authorizing that person to bring into the State, transport, or possess as a collector, a greater amount of those alcoholic beverages than is otherwise authorized by this Chapter, or to sell those alcoholic beverages in a manner prescribed by the Commission.

A permit may be issued to a unit of local government, or to a nonprofit organization or a political organization to serve wine, malt beverages, and spirituous liquor at a ticketed event held to allow the unit of local government or organization to raise funds. For purposes of this subdivision “nonprofit organization” means an organization that is exempt from taxation under Section 501(c)(3), 501(c)(4), 501(c)(6), 501(c)(8), 501(c)(10), 501(c)(19), or 501(d) of the Internal Revenue Code or is exempt under similar provisions of the General Statutes as a bona fide nonprofit charitable, civic, religious, fraternal, patriotic, or veterans’ organization or as a nonprofit volunteer fire department, or as a nonprofit volunteer rescue squad or a bona fide homeowners’ or property owners’ association. For purposes of this subdivision “political organization” means an organization covered by the provisions of G.S. 163-96(a)(1) or (2) or a campaign organization established by or for a person who is a candidate who has filed a notice of candidacy, paid the filing fees or filed the required petition, and been certified as a candidate. The issuance of this permit shall also allow the issuance of a purchase-transportation permit under

G.S. 18B-403

and 18B-404 and the use for culinary purposes of spirituous liquor lawfully purchased for use in mixed beverages. The issuance of this permit shall also allow a nonprofit organization to offer alcoholic beverages in the manufacturer’s original closed container as a prize in a raffle or sell alcoholic beverages in the manufacturer’s original closed container at auction at the ticketed event to allow the nonprofit organization to raise funds.

A permit may be issued to a professional sports organization to allow the retail sale of malt beverages, unfortified wine, fortified wine, or mixed beverages for consumption on the premises at a professional sporting event held at a stadium (i) with a seating capacity of at least 40,000 people and (ii) that is owned or leased by a constituent institution of The University of North Carolina located in a county with a population of at least 900,000 people according to the most recent federal decennial census. The issuance of this permit also allows the issuance of a purchase-transportation permit under

G.S. 18B-403

and

G.S. 18B-404

. For purposes of this subdivision, the term “professional sports organization” means an organization that is a member of an association or league of professional sports organizations that (i) has 6 or more members, (ii) has total combined revenues from all members that exceeds ten million dollars ($10,000,000) per year, and (iii) governs the conduct of its members and regulates the contests and exhibitions in which its member organizations regularly engage.

Intent. — Permits under this section are to be issued only for the limited circumstances listed in subsection (a) of this section and not as substitutes for other permits required by this Chapter.

Conditions of Permit. — A permit issued under this section shall be valid only for the single transaction or the kind of activity specified in the permit and shall be subject to any conditions the Commission may impose as to the time, place and manner of the authorized activity.

Administrative Procedure. — Denial or revocation of a permit under this section shall not entitle the applicant or permittee to a hearing under Chapter 150B.

History.

1977, c. 854, s. 1; 1981, c. 412, s. 2; 1987, c. 434, s. 2; c. 827, s. 1; 1989, c. 130; c. 800, ss. 13, 14; 2001-262, s. 9; 2008-159, s. 1; 2017-6, s. 3; 2017-87, s. 3(b); 2018-100, s. 5(e); 2018-145, s. 13(a); 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), 6.1.

Re-recodification; Technical and Conforming Changes.

Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, provides, in part: “The Revisor of Statutes shall recodify Chapter 138A of the General Statutes, Chapter 120C of the General Statutes, as well as Chapter 163 of the General Statutes, as amended by this act, into a new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes to be entitled ‘Elections and Ethics Enforcement Act,’ as enacted by Section 4 of this act. The Revisor may also recodify into the new Chapter 163A of the General Statutes other existing statutory laws relating to elections and ethics enforcement that are located elsewhere in the General Statutes as the Revisor deems appropriate.” The Revisor was further authorized to make additional technical and conforming changes to catchlines, internal citations, and other references throughout the General Statutes to effectuate this recodification. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes substituted “163A-950(a)(1) or (2)” for “163-96(a)(1) or (2)” in subdivision (a)(5).

Session Laws 2018-146, ss. 3.1(a), (b), and 6.1, repealed Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3, and authorized the Revisor of Statutes to re-recodify Chapter 163A into Chapters 163, 138A, and 120C and to revert the changes made by the Revisor pursuant to Session Laws 2017-6, s. 3. Pursuant to this authority, the Revisor of Statutes reverted the change to the reference in subdivision (a)(5).

§ 18B-1002.1.
Special auction permit.

Permit Authorized. — A permit may be issued upon application to an auction firm or auctioneer licensed by the North Carolina Auctioneers Commission pursuant to Chapter 85B of the General Statutes to allow the licensed auction firm or auctioneer to sell at auction items described in G.S. 18B-1002(a)(4). An auction held under this section may receive competing bids that are in person or by telephone, fax, or online.

Conditions of Permit. — A permit issued under this section is valid only for the auction specified in the permit. Any sales under this permit are subject to the purchase restrictions in

G.S. 18B-303

.

Administrative Procedure. — Denial or revocation of a permit under this section does not entitle the applicant or permittee to a hearing under Chapter 150B of the General Statutes.

History.

2017-87, s. 3(c).

§ 18B-1003.
Responsibilities of permittee.

Premises. — For purposes of this Chapter, a permittee shall be responsible for the entire premises for which the permit is issued. The permittee shall keep the premises clean, well-lighted and orderly.

Employees. — For purposes of this Chapter, a permittee shall be responsible for the actions of all employees of the business for which the permit is issued. Each holder of a salesman’s permit shall be responsible for all sales and deliveries made by his helpers.

Certain Employees Prohibited. — A permittee shall not knowingly employ in the sale or distribution of alcoholic beverages any person who has been:

Convicted of a felony within three years;

Convicted of a felony more than three years previously and has not had his citizenship restored;

Convicted of an alcoholic beverage offense within two years; or

Convicted of a misdemeanor controlled substances offense within two years; [or]

A past permit holder under Chapter 18B of the General Statutes whose permit had been revoked within the last 18 months and who had been the permit holder at the location where the person would be employed.For purposes of this subsection, “conviction” has the same meaning as in G.S. 18B-900(b). To avoid undue hardship, the Commission may, in its discretion, exempt persons on a case-by-case basis from this subsection.

(c1)

Posting Human Trafficking Hotline. —

All permittees shall prominently display on the premises in a place that is clearly conspicuous and visible to employees a public awareness sign created and provided by the North Carolina Human Trafficking Commission that contains the National Human Trafficking Resource hotline information.

Financial Responsibility. — A permittee shall pay all judgments rendered against him under the provisions of Article 1A of this Chapter. When the Commission is informed, under the provisions of

G.S. 18B-127

that there is an outstanding unsatisfied judgment against a permittee, the Commission shall suspend all of the permittee’s permits. Notice and hearing are not required for a suspension under this subsection, and the suspension shall become effective immediately upon the Commission’s receipt of the report. The suspension shall remain in effect until the permittee demonstrates that he has satisfied the judgment by payment in full. Nothing in this section relieves the permittee of the obligation to pay any applicable fees as a precondition of the reinstatement of his permit.

History.

1981, c. 412, s. 2; 1983, c. 435, s. 40; 2006-253, s. 28; 2017-57, s. 17.4(b); 2017-197, s. 5.8; 2018-97, s. 5.4.

§ 18B-1004.
Hours for sale and consumption.

Hours. — Except as otherwise provided in this section, it shall be unlawful to sell malt beverages, unfortified wine, fortified wine, or mixed beverages between the hours of 2:00 A.M. and 7:00 A.M., or to consume any of those alcoholic beverages between the hours of 2:30 A.M. and 7:00 A.M., in any place that has been issued a permit under

G.S. 18B-1001

or

G.S. 18B-1105

.

Repealed by Session Laws 1991, c. 689, s. 310, effective August 1, 1991.

Sunday Hours. — Except as authorized pursuant to

G.S. 18B-112(b1)

, 153A-145.7, or 160A-205.3, it shall be unlawful to sell or consume alcoholic beverages on any licensed premises from the time at which sale or consumption must cease on Sunday morning until 12:00 Noon on that day.

Local Option. — A city may adopt an ordinance prohibiting in the city the retail sale of malt beverages, unfortified wine, and fortified wine during any or all of the hours from 12:00 Noon on Sunday until 7:00 A.M. on the following Monday. A county may adopt an ordinance prohibiting, in the parts of the county outside any city, the retail sale of malt beverages, unfortified wine, and fortified wine during any or all of the hours from 12:00 Noon on Sunday until 7:00 A.M. on the following Monday. Neither a city nor a county, however, may prohibit those sales in establishments having brown-bagging or mixed beverages permits.

This section does not prohibit at any time the wholesale delivery and sale of unfortified wine, fortified wine, and malt beverages to retailers issued permits pursuant to

G.S. 18B-1001

or G.S. 18B-1002(a)(2) or (5).

History.

1943, c. 339, ss. 1-3; 1949, c. 974, s. 12; 1951, c. 997, s. 1; 1953, c. 675, s. 4; 1963, c. 426, ss. 7-9, 12; 1969, c. 1131; 1971, c. 872, s. 1; 1973, cc. 56, 153; 1979, c. 286, s. 3; 1981, c. 412, s. 2; 1987, c. 35; c. 308; 1991, c. 689, s. 310; 1993, c. 243, ss. 1, 2; c. 415, s. 16; 2017-87, s. 4(a); 2021-150, s. 12.1.

Cross References.

As to suspension of alcohol sales in the latter portion of professional sporting events to protect public safety, see G.S. 18B-1009(b).

§ 18B-1005.
Conduct on licensed premises.

Certain Conduct. — It shall be unlawful for a permittee or his agent or employee to knowingly allow any of the following kinds of conduct to occur on his licensed premises:

Any violation of this Chapter;

Any fighting or other disorderly conduct that can be prevented without undue danger to the permittee, his employees or patrons; or

Any violation of the controlled substances, gambling, or prostitution statutes, or any other unlawful acts.

through (6) Repealed by Session Laws 2003-382, s. 1, effective August 1, 2003.

Supervision. — It shall be unlawful for a permittee to fail to superintend in person or through a manager the business for which a permit is issued.

History.

1943, c. 400, s. 6; 1945, c. 708, s. 6; c. 903, s. 1; 1947, c. 1098, ss. 2, 3; 1949, c. 974, ss. 13, 15; c. 1251, s. 3; 1957, c. 1048; 1959, c. 745, s. 2; 1963, c. 426, ss. 6, 10, 12; c. 460, s. 1; 1971, c. 872, s. 1; 1973, c. 30; c. 1295; c. 1452, s. 4; 1977, c. 176, ss. 1-3; 1981, c. 412, s. 2; 1981 (Reg. Sess., 1982), c. 1262, ss. 18, 19; 2003-382, s. 1.

§ 18B-1005.1.
Sexually explicit conduct on licensed premises.

It shall be unlawful for a permittee or his agent or employee to knowingly allow or engage in any of the following kinds of conduct on his licensed premises:

Any conduct or entertainment by any person whose genitals are exposed or who is wearing transparent clothing that reveals the genitals;

Any conduct or entertainment that includes or simulates sexual intercourse, masturbation, sodomy, bestiality, oral copulation, flagellation, or any act that includes or simulates the penetration, however slight, by any object into the genital or anal opening of a person’s body; or

Any conduct or entertainment that includes the fondling of the breasts, buttocks, anus, vulva, or genitals.

Supervision. — It shall be unlawful for a permittee to fail to superintend in person or through a manager the business for which a permit is issued.

Exception. — This section does not apply to persons operating theaters, concert halls, art centers, museums, or similar establishments that are primarily devoted to the arts or theatrical performances, when the performances that are presented are expressing matters of serious literary, artistic, scientific, or political value.

History.

2003-382, s. 2.